Hawaii statutes.
§157-42 Interstate and federal compacts.
The board of agriculture may confer with authorities of other states and of the
United States with respect to uniform milk control with states or as between
states, and with the federal government in its control of prices of milk
handled in interstate commerce, and may exercise its powers hereunder to effect
uniform milk control. It may join with such other authorities, federal and
state, in conducting joint investigations, holding joint hearings, and issue
joint or concurrent orders, or orders supplementary to those of the federal
government, and shall have the power to employ or designate a joint agent or
joint agencies to carry out and enforce such joint, concurrent, or
supplementary orders. [L 1967, c 260, §26; HRS §157-42]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next